North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 6. Broker Price Opinions and Comparative Market Analyses.

§ 93A-82.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, the terms “broker price opinion” and “comparative market analysis” mean an estimate prepared by a licensed real estate broker that details the probable selling price or leasing price of a particular parcel of or interest in property and provides a varying level of detail about the property’s condition, market, and neighborhood, and information on comparable properties, but does not include an automated valuation model.

History.

2012-163, s. 2.

§ 93A-83.
Broker price opinions and comparative market analyses for a fee.

Authorized. — A person licensed under this Chapter, other than a provisional broker, may prepare a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis and charge and collect a fee for the opinion if:

The license of that licensee is active and in good standing; and

The broker price opinion or comparative market analysis meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.

The requirements of this Article shall not apply to any broker price opinion or comparative market analysis performed by a licensee for no fee or consideration.

For Whom Opinion May Be Prepared. — Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a person licensed under this Chapter may prepare a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis for any of the following:

An existing or potential seller of a parcel of real property.

An existing or potential buyer of a parcel of real property.

An existing or potential lessor of a parcel of or interest in real property.

An existing or potential lessee of a parcel of or interest in real property.

A third party making decisions or performing due diligence related to the potential listing, offering, sale, option, lease, or acquisition price of a parcel of or interest in real property.

An existing or potential lienholder or other third party for any purpose other than as the basis to determine the value of a parcel of or interest in property, for a mortgage loan origination, including first and second mortgages, refinances, or equity lines of credit.

The provisions of this subsection do not preclude the preparation of a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis to be used in conjunction with or in addition to an appraisal.

Required Contents of a Broker Price Opinion or Comparative Market Analysis. — A broker price opinion or comparative market analysis shall be in writing and conform to the standards provided in this Article that shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

A statement of the intended purpose of the broker price opinion or comparative market analysis.

A brief description of the subject property and property interest to be priced.

The basis of reasoning used to reach the conclusion of the price, including the applicable market data or capitalization computation.

Any assumptions or limiting conditions.

A disclosure of any existing or contemplated interest of the broker issuing the broker price opinion, including the possibility of representing the landlord/tenant or seller/buyer.

The effective date of the broker price opinion.

The name and signature of the broker issuing the broker price opinion and broker license number.

The name of the real estate brokerage firm for which the broker is acting.

The signature date.

A disclaimer stating that “This opinion is not an appraisal of the market value of the property, and may not be used in lieu of an appraisal. If an appraisal is desired, the services of a licensed or certified appraiser shall be obtained. This opinion may not be used by any party as the primary basis to determine the value of a parcel of or interest in real property for a mortgage loan origination, including first and second mortgages, refinances, or equity lines of credit.”

A copy of the assignment request for the broker price opinion or comparative market analysis.

Rules. — The North Carolina Real Estate Commission shall have the power to adopt rules that are not inconsistent with the provisions in this Article.

Additional Requirements for Electronic or Form Submission. — In addition to the requirement of subsection (c) of this section, if a broker price opinion is submitted electronically or on a form supplied by the requesting party, the following provisions apply:

A signature required by subdivision (7) of subsection (c) of this section may be an electronic signature, as defined in

G.S. 47-16.2

.

A signature required by subdivision (7) of subsection (c) of this section and the disclaimer required by subdivision (10) of subsection (c) of this section may be transmitted in a separate attachment if the electronic format or form supplied by the requesting party does not allow additional comments to be written by the licensee. The electronic format or form supplied by the requesting party shall do the following:

Reference the existence of a separate attachment.

Include a statement that the broker price opinion or comparative market analysis is not complete without the attachment.

Restrictions. — Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, a person licensed pursuant to this Chapter may not knowingly prepare a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis for any purpose in lieu of an appraisal when an appraisal is required by federal or State law. A broker price opinion or comparative market analysis that estimates the value of or worth a parcel of or interest in real estate rather than sales or leasing price shall be deemed to be an appraisal and may not be prepared by a licensed broker under the authority of this Article, but may only be prepared by a duly licensed or certified appraiser, and shall meet the regulations adopted by the North Carolina Appraisal Board. A broker price opinion or comparative market analysis shall not under any circumstances be referred to as a valuation or appraisal.

No Report of Predetermined Result. — A broker price opinion or comparative market analysis shall not include the reporting of a predetermined result.

History.

2012-163, s. 2; 2012-194, s. 61.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-194, s. 61, effective July 17, 2012, substituted “shall include” for “may include” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (c).